Utah statutes.
31A-19a-307.   Rate service organizations -- Permitted activity.

A rate service organization may on behalf of its members and subscribers:

(1)  develop statistical plans including territorial and class definitions;

(2)  collect statistical data from:

(a)  members;

(b)  subscribers; or

(c)  any other source;

(3)  prepare, file, and distribute prospective loss costs which may include provisions for special assessments;

(4)  prepare, file, and distribute:

(a)  factors;

(b)  calculations;

(c)  formulas pertaining to classification; or

(d)  territory, increased limits, and other variables;

(5)  prepare, file, and distribute supplementary rating information;

(6)  distribute information that is required or directed to be filed with the commissioner;

(7)  conduct research and on-site inspections to prepare classifications of public fire defenses;

(8)  consult with public officials regarding public fire protection as it would affect members, subscribers, and others;

(9)  conduct research and onsight inspections to discover, identify, and classify information relating to causes or prevention of losses;

(10)  conduct research relating to the impact of statutory changes upon prospective loss costs;

(11)  prepare, file, and distribute policy forms and endorsements;

(12)  consult with members, subscribers, and others concerning use and application of the policy forms and endorsements described in Subsection (11);

(13)  conduct research and on-site inspections for the purpose of providing risk information relating to individual structures;

(14)  conduct on-site inspections to determine rating classifications for individual insureds;

(15)  collect, compile, and publish past and current prices of individual insurers, provided the information is also made available to the general public at a reasonable cost;

(16)  collect and compile exposure and loss experience for the purpose of individual risk experience ratings;

(17)  furnish any other services, as approved or directed by the commissioner, related to those enumerated in this section; and

(18)  engage in any other activity not prohibited by this title.



Enacted by Chapter 130, 1999 General Session

